Massachusetts, session 194th, H2168.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 25 of Chapter 151A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out section (b) and inserting in place thereof the
following:-
(b) Any week with respect to which the commissioner finds that his unemployment is
due to a stoppage of work which exists because of a labor dispute at the factory, establishment or
other premises at which he was last employed for a period of 30 days following the
commencement of the unemployment caused by the labor dispute, except that the period without
benefits shall not apply if the employer hires a permanent replacement worker for the claimant’s
position. A replacement worker shall be presumed to be permanent unless the employer certifies
in writing that the claimant will be permitted to return to their prior position upon conclusion of
of 4

the dispute. If the employer does not permit the return, the claimant shall be entitled to recover
any benefits lost as a result of the 30 day waiting period before receiving benefits; however, no
waiting period or disqualification under this subsection (b) shall apply if the labor dispute is
caused by the failure or refusal of the employer to comply with an agreement or contract between
the employer and the claimant, including a collective bargaining agreement with a union
representing the claimant, or a state or federal law pertaining to hours, wages, or conditions of
work; provided, however, that nothing in this subsection shall be construed so as to deny benefits
to an otherwise eligible individual (1) who becomes involuntarily unemployed during the period
of the negotiation of a collective bargaining contract, in which case the individual shall receive
benefits for the period of his unemployment but in no event beyond the date of the
commencement of a strike; or (2) who is not recalled to work within one week following the
termination of the labor dispute; and provided, further, that this subsection shall not apply if it is
shown to the satisfaction of the commissioner that:
(1) The employee is not participating in or financing or directly interested in the labor
dispute which caused the stoppage of work; and that
(2) The employee does not belong to a grade or class of workers of which, immediately
before the commencement of the stoppage, there were members employed at the premises at
which the stoppage occurs, any of whom are participating in or financing or directly interested in
the dispute, except that an individual for whom no work is available and who is not a member of
or eligible to membership in the group or organization which caused the stoppage, shall not be
considered as belonging to the same grade or class of workers as those who are responsible for
the stoppage of work; provided, further, that if, in any case, separate branches of work which are
commonly conducted as separate businesses in separate premises are conducted in separate
of 4

departments of the same premises, each such department may, for the purposes of this
subsection, be deemed a separate factory, establishment or other premises.
(3) For the purposes of this chapter, the payment of regular union dues or assessments
shall not be construed as participating in or financing or being directly interested in a labor
dispute.
(4) The individual has, subsequent to his unemployment because of a labor dispute,
obtained employment, and has been paid wages of not less than the amount specified in clause
(a) of section twenty-four; provided, however, that during the existence of such labor dispute the
wages of such individual used for the determination of his benefit rights shall not include any
wages such individual earned from the employer involved in such labor dispute.
In addition to the foregoing, an employee shall not be denied benefits as the result of an
employer's lockout, whether or not there is a stoppage of work, if such employees are ready,
willing and able to work under the terms and conditions of the existing or expired contract
pending the negotiation of a new contract unless the employer shows by a preponderance of
evidence that the lockout is in response to: (a) acts of repeated and substantial damage to the
employer's property, or (b) repeated threats of imminent, substantial damage; provided, however,
that such damage or threats of damage are caused or directed by members of the bargaining unit
with the express or implied approval of the officers of such unit, and the employer has taken all
reasonable measures to prevent such damage to property and such efforts have been
unsuccessful.
A lockout, as used in this subsection, shall exist whether or not such action is to obtain
for the employer more advantageous terms when an employer fails to provide employment to his
of 4

employees with whom he is engaged in a labor dispute, either by physically closing his plant or
informing his employees that there will be no work until the labor dispute has terminated.
of 4